North Carolina, session 2025, HB452.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-277.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-277.4. Obstruction of health care facilities.
(a) No person shall obstruct or block another person's access to or egress from a health
care facility or from the common areas of the real property upon which the facility is located in
a manner that deprives or delays the person from obtaining or providing health care services in
the facility.
(b) No person shall injure or threaten to injure a person who is or has been:been doing
any of the following:
(1) Obtaining health care services;services.
(2) Lawfully aiding another to obtain health care services; orservices.
(3) Providing health care services.
(b1) No person shall knowingly approach another person within 8 feet of such person,
unless such other person consents, for the purpose of passing a leaflet or handbill to, displaying
a sign to, or engaging in oral protest, education, or counseling with such other person in the public
way or sidewalk area within a radius of 100 feet from any entrance door to a health care facility.
(c) A violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor. A second
conviction for a violation of either subsection (a) or (b) of this section within three years of the
first shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor. A third second or subsequent conviction for
a violation of either subsection (a) or (b) of this section within three years of the second or most
recent conviction shall be punishable as a Class I felony.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H452-v-1*